Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1384
Crematory authority; bylaws.

A crematory authority may enact reasonable bylaws not inconsistent with the Cremation of Human Remains Act for the management and operation of a crematory operated by such authority. Nothing in this section shall prevent a crematory authority from enacting bylaws which contain more stringent requirements than those provided in the act.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 30.